Utah statutes.
59-10-541.   Violations -- Civil and criminal penalties.

(1)  Every person who, without fraudulent intent, fails to make, render, sign, or verify any return, or to supply any information within the time required by or under the provisions of this chapter, is liable for a penalty as provided in Section 59-1-401.

(2)  It is unlawful for any person, with intent to evade any tax, to fail to timely remit the full amount of tax required by this chapter.  A violation of this section is punishable as provided in Section 59-1-401.

(3)  Any person who knowingly or intentionally makes, renders, signs, or verifies any false or fraudulent return or statement or supplies any false or fraudulent information is guilty of a criminal violation as provided in Section 59-1-401.

(4)  Any person who, with intent to evade any tax or any requirement of this chapter, or any lawful requirement of the commission, fails to pay the tax, or to make, render, sign, or verify any return, or to supply any information, within the time required by or under this chapter, or who, with like intent, makes, renders, signs, or verifies any false or fraudulent return or statement, or supplies any false or fraudulent information, is liable for a civil penalty as provided in Section 59-1-401, and is also guilty of a criminal violation as provided in Section 59-1-401.

